glossing/ckt.twoc
Alphabet

%[%+approx%]:0
%[%+ints%]:0
%[%+ints2%]:0
%[%+ints3%]:0
%[%+desid%]:0
%[%+ap%]:0
%[%+caus%]:0
%[%+fut%]:0
%[%+cond%]:0
%[%+inv%]:0
%[%+inv2%]:0
%[%+itsaverb%]:0
%[%+complex%]:0
%[%+f%]:0
%[%+restr%]:0
%[%+auth%]:0
%[%+imposs%]:0
%[%+vb%-approx%]:0
%[%+vb%-com%]:0
%[%+vb%-intens%]:0
%[%+vb%-neg%]:0
%[%+vb%-neg2%]:0
%[%+vb%-restr%]:0

%<n%>:%<n%>                     ! Noun
%<prn%>:%<prn%>                   ! Pronoun
%<ij%>:%<ij%>                    ! Interjection
%<cnjcoo%>:%<cnjcoo%>                ! Co-ordinating conjunction
%<cnjadv%>:%<cnjadv%>                ! Adverbial conjunction
%<v%>:%<v%>                     ! Verb
%<adv%>:%<adv%>                   ! Adverb
%<adj%>:%<adj%>                   ! Adjective
%<part%>:%<part%>                  ! Particle
%<ptcp%>:%<ptcp%>                  ! Participle
%<cmp%>:%<cmp%>                   ! Compound
%<incorp%>:%<incorp%>
%<clitic%>:%<clitic%>
%<emph%>:%<emph%>

%<lpar%>:%<lpar%>
%<rpar%>:%<rpar%>
%<sent%>:%<sent%>
%<rquot%>:%<rquot%>
%<lquot%>:%<lquot%>
%<guio%>:%<guio%>
%<cm%>:%<cm%>
%<apos%>:%<apos%>
%<quot%>:%<quot%>


%<iv%>:%<iv%>                    ! Intransitive
%<tv%>:%<tv%>                    ! Transitive

%<stat%>:%<stat%>                  ! Stative forms

%<neut%>:%<neut%>                  ! Neutral aspect
%<prog%>:%<prog%>                  ! Progressive aspect

%<aor%>:%<aor%>                   ! Non-future
%<fut%>:%<fut%>                   ! Future
%<intn%>:%<intn%>                  ! Intentional
%<cond%>:%<cond%>                  ! Conditional

%<inf%>:%<inf%>                   ! Infinitive
%<perf%>:%<perf%>                  ! Perfect
%<hab%>:%<hab%>                   ! Habitual

%<gna%_sim%>:%<gna%_sim%>               ! Simultaneous converb
%<gna%_ant%>:%<gna%_ant%>               ! Anterior temporal converb (temporal sequence)
%<gna%_res%>:%<gna%_res%>               ! Anterior temporal converb (consequence)

%<act%>:%<act%>
%<pass%>:%<pass%>
%<ger%>:%<ger%>

%<th%>:%<th%>                    ! thematic verb suffixes
%<approx%>:%<approx%>                ! Approximative
%<ints%>:%<ints%>                  ! Intensifier
%<ints2%>:%<ints2%>                 ! Intensifier 2
%<ap%>:%<ap%>                    ! Antipassive
%<ap2%>:%<ap2%>                   ! Antipassive
%<caus%>:%<caus%>                  ! Causative
%<punct%>:%<punct%>                 ! Punctual
%<dim%>:%<dim%>                   ! Diminutive (verbal)
%<aug%>:%<aug%>                   ! Augmentative (verbal)
%<res%>:%<res%>                   ! Resultative
%<rev%>:%<rev%>
%<purp%>:%<purp%>                  ! Purposive
%<consume%>:%<consume%>
%<utilit%>:%<utilit%>
%<vrblz%>:%<vrblz%>                 ! Verb deriving suffix
%<vrblz2%>:%<vrblz2%>                ! Verb deriving suffix 2
%<desid%>:%<desid%>                 ! Desiderative
%<iter%>:%<iter%>                  ! Iterative
%<coop%_s%>:%<coop%_s%>                ! Collective S
%<coop%_o%>:%<coop%_o%>                ! Collective O
%<dur%>:%<dur%>                   ! Durative
%<inch%>:%<inch%>                  ! Inchoative
%<inch2%>:%<inch2%>                 ! Inchoative 2
%<compl%>:%<compl%>                 ! Completive
%<imposs%>:%<imposs%>                ! Impossibilitive
%<restr%>:%<restr%>                 ! Restrictive
%<rel%_n%>:%<rel%_n%>                 ! Relational noun



%<s%_sg1%>:%<s%_sg1%>                 ! Subject, 1st person singular
%<s%_sg2%>:%<s%_sg2%>                 ! Subject, 2nd person singular
%<s%_sg3%>:%<s%_sg3%>                 ! Subject, 3rd person singular
%<s%_pl1%>:%<s%_pl1%>                 ! Subject, 1st person plural
%<s%_pl2%>:%<s%_pl2%>                 ! Subject, 2nd person plural
%<s%_pl3%>:%<s%_pl3%>                 ! Subject, 3rd person plural

%<a%_sg1%>:%<a%_sg1%>                 ! Agent, 1st person singular
%<a%_sg2%>:%<a%_sg2%>                 ! Agent, 2nd person singular
%<a%_sg3%>:%<a%_sg3%>                 ! Agent, 3rd person singular
%<a%_pl1%>:%<a%_pl1%>                 ! Agent, 1st person plural
%<a%_pl2%>:%<a%_pl2%>                 ! Agent, 2nd person plural
%<a%_pl3%>:%<a%_pl3%>                 ! Agent, 3rd person plural

%<o%_sg1%>:%<o%_sg1%>                 ! Object, 1st person singular
%<o%_sg2%>:%<o%_sg2%>                 ! Object, 2nd person singular
%<o%_sg3%>:%<o%_sg3%>                 ! Object, 3rd person singular
%<o%_pl1%>:%<o%_pl1%>                 ! Object, 1st person plural
%<o%_pl2%>:%<o%_pl2%>                 ! Object, 2nd person plural
%<o%_pl3%>:%<o%_pl3%>                 ! Object, 3rd person plural

%<a%_1%>:%<a%_1%>                   ! Agent, 1st person
%<a%_3%>:%<a%_3%>                   ! Agent, 3rd person
%<o%_2%>:%<o%_2%>                   ! Object, 2nd person
%<o%_3%>:%<o%_3%>                   ! Object, 2nd person
%<3%>:%<3%>                     ! Non-specified third person

%<pl%>:%<pl%>                    ! Plural
%<sg%>:%<sg%>                    ! Singular

%<sing%>:%<sing%>                  ! Singulative

%<aa%>:%<aa%>                    ! Animates

%<def%>:%<def%>                   ! Definite

%<abl%>:%<abl%>                   ! Ablative
%<abs%>:%<abs%>                   ! Absolutive
%<ori%>:%<ori%>                   ! Orientative
%<erg%>:%<erg%>                   ! Ergative
%<all%>:%<all%>                   ! Allative
%<ess%>:%<ess%>                   ! Essive [Equative]
%<loc%>:%<loc%>                   ! Locative

%<ine%>:%<ine%>                   ! Inessive
%<subst%>:%<subst%>                 ! Substantive
%<per%>:%<per%>                   ! Perlative
%<com%>:%<com%>                   ! Comitative
%<assoc%>:%<assoc%>                 ! Associative
%<prv%>:%<prv%>                   ! Privative

%<nmzr%>:%<nmzr%>                  ! Nominalizer

%<px1sg%>:%<px1sg%>                 ! 1sg possessor
%<px2sg%>:%<px2sg%>                 ! 2sg possessor
%<px3sg%>:%<px3sg%>                 ! 3sg possessor
%<px1pl%>:%<px1pl%>                 ! 1pl possessor
%<px2pl%>:%<px2pl%>                 ! 2pl possessor
%<px3pl%>:%<px3pl%>                 ! 3pl possessor

%<poss%>:%<poss%>                  ! Possessor

%<1sg%>:%<1sg%>                   ! 1sg possessed
%<2sg%>:%<2sg%>                   ! 2sg possessed
%<3sg%>:%<3sg%>                   ! 3sg possessed
%<1pl%>:%<1pl%>                   ! 1pl possessed
%<2pl%>:%<2pl%>                   ! 2pl possessed
%<3pl%>:%<3pl%>                   ! 3pl possessed

%<top%>:%<top%>                   ! Spatial derivations
%<side%>:%<side%>
%<edge%>:%<edge%>
%<near%>:%<near%>
%<bottom%>:%<bottom%>
%<ext%>:%<ext%>
%<among%>:%<among%>
%<in%>:%<in%>
%<surf%>:%<surf%>
%<front%>:%<front%>

%<adv%_prol%>                     ! Prolative adverb

%<dim%>:%<dim%>
%<aug%>:%<aug%>
%<coop%>:%<coop%>
%<prtt%>:%<prtt%>                  ! Part of
%<pers%_n%>:%<pers%_n%>                ! Personal name

%<pers%>:%<pers%>                  ! Personal pronoun
%<itg%>:%<itg%>                   ! Interrogative pronoun
%<ind%>:%<ind%>                   ! Indicative?
%<dem%>:%<dem%>                   ! Demonstrative pronoun
%<quant%>:%<quant%>                 ! Quantifier pronoun
%<p1%>:%<p1%>                    ! First person
%<p2%>:%<p2%>                    ! Second person
%<p3%>:%<p3%>                    ! Third person
%<der%>:%<der%>
%<subst%>:%<subst%>

;


Rules

"Approximative"
%[%+approx%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+approx%]:0 ;
                 %[%+approx%]:0 :* _ ;

"Intensifier1"
%[%+ints%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+ints%]:0 ;
               %[%+ints%]:0 :* _ ;

"Intensifier2"
%[%+ints2%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+ints2%]:0 ;
                %[%+ints2%]:0 :* _ ;

"Intensifier3"
%[%+ints3%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+ints3%]:0 ;
                %[%+ints3%]:0 :* _ ;

"Desiderative"
%[%+desid%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+desid%]:0 ;
                %[%+desid%]:0 :* _ ;

"Antipassive"
%[%+ap%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+ap%]:0 ;
             %[%+ap%]:0 :* _ ;

"Causative"
%[%+caus%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+caus%]:0 ;
               %[%+caus%]:0 :* _ ;

"Future"
%[%+fut%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+fut%]:0 ;
                %[%+fut%]:0 :* _ ;

!
"Conditional"
%[%+cond%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+cond%]:0 ;
                %[%+cond%]:0 :* _ ;

"Inversive in progressive o_1pl"
%[%+inv%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+inv%]:0 ;
                %[%+inv%]:0 :* _ ;

"Inversive prefix ine"
%[%+inv2%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+inv2%]:0 ;
                %[%+inv2%]:0 :* _ ;

"Verb derived"
%[%+itsaverb%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+itsaverb%]:0 ;
                %[%+itsaverb%]:0 :* _ ;

"Complex"
%[%+complex%]:0 <=> [ : - %[%+complex%]:0 ]* _ [ : - %[%+complex%]:0 ]* ;

"Feminine"
%[%+f%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+f%]:0 ;
                %[%+f%]:0 :* _ ;

"Restrictive"
%[%+restr%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+restr%]:0 ;
                %[%+restr%]:0 :* _ ;

"Auth"
%[%+auth%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+auth%]:0 ;
                %[%+auth%]:0 :* _ ;


"Impossibilitive"
%[%+imposs%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+imposs%]:0 ;
                %[%+imposs%]:0 :* _ ;
!

"Verb base approximative"
%[%+vb%-approx%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+vb%-approx%]:0 ;
                %[%+vb%-approx%]:0 :* _ ;
!
"Verb base commitative"
%[%+vb%-com%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+vb%-com%]:0 ;
                %[%+vb%-com%]:0 :* _ ;
!
"Verb base intensifier"
%[%+vb%-intens%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+vb%-intens%]:0 ;
                %[%+vb%-intens%]:0 :* _ ;
!
"Verb base negation"
%[%+vb%-neg%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+vb%-neg%]:0 ;
                %[%+vb%-neg%]:0 :* _ ;
!
"Verb base negation 2"
%[%+vb%-neg2%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+vb%-neg2%]:0 ;
                %[%+vb%-neg2%]:0 :* _ ;
!
"Verb base vb-restrictive"
%[%+vb%-restr%]:0 <=> _ :* %[%+vb%-restr%]:0 ;
                %[%+vb%-restr%]:0 :* _ ;
!
